Utah statutes.
10-3-1011.   Temporary employees.
The head of each department, with the advice and consent of the board of city
commissioners, may employ any person for temporary work only, without making
the appointment from the certified list, but the appointment shall not be
longer than one month in the same calendar year, and under no circumstances
shall the temporary employee be appointed to a permanent position unless he
shall have been duly certified by the civil service commission as in other
cases.
